Colorado statutes. TITLE 36 Natural Resources - General
ARTICLE 1
STATE BOARD OF LAND COMMISSIONERS

Cross references:

For composition, membership, and duties of the state board of land commissioners, see §§ 9 and 10 of art. IX, Colo. Const.

Section

36-1-100.3. Definitions.

As used in this article, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Commercial real property" means real property intended to generate income either from capital gain or rental income, such as office buildings.

"Land" means any ground, soil, water, real property, commercial real property, minerals, mineral resources, or earth whatsoever.

"Minerals" or "mineral resources" means any valuable inert or lifeless substance formed or deposited in its present position through natural agencies and which is found either in or on the soil or rock of the earth, including without limitation those commodities subject to regulation under articles 32, 32.5, 33, and 60 of title 34, C.R.S., including but not limited to oil, gas, coal, sand, gravel, and other minerals.

"Permanent school fund" means the public school fund created in section 3 of article IX of the state constitution, which is the same as the public school fund described in section 22-41-102, C.R.S.

"Real property" means buildings, structures, fixtures, and improvements on land, and every estate, interest, privilege, tenement, easement, right-of-way, and other right in land, legal or equitable, including leasehold interests.

"State board of land commissioners" or "state board" means the state board of land commissioners described in section 36-1-101.5.

"State school lands" means an endowment of land assets held in a perpetual, intergenerational public trust for the support of public schools.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire section added, p. 832, § 1, effective May 21.

L. 2013:

Entire section amended, (HB 13-1274), ch. 376, p. 2208, § 1, effective June 5.

36-1-101. Record of proceedings.

The state board of land commissioners shall keep a complete record of its proceedings in a suitable book and shall preserve all important papers and documents pertaining to the state lands.

Source:

L. 19:

p. 637, § 1.

C.L.

§ 1146.

CSA:

C. 134, § 44.

CRS 53:

§ 112-3-1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 112-3-1.

36-1-101.5. Appointment of members - duties.

The state board of land commissioners shall be composed of five members appointed by the governor, with the consent of the senate, one of whom shall be elected by the board as its president. The board shall meet at least once every month.

The governor shall endeavor to appoint members of the board who reside in different geographic regions of the state. Not more than three members of the board may be affiliated with the same political party. The board consists of:

One person with substantial experience in production agriculture;

One person with substantial experience in public primary or secondary education;

One person with substantial experience in local government and land use planning;

One person with substantial experience in natural resource conservation; and

One member at large who is a resident of the state.

The term of each member shall be for four years. No member shall serve more than two consecutive terms. Members of the board shall be subject to removal, and vacancies on the board shall be filled as provided in section 6 of article IV of the state constitution.

Repealed.

The members of the state board of land commissioners shall not, by virtue of their appointment, be employees of the state. The board members shall be reimbursed for their reasonable and necessary expenses and receive a per diem of fifty dollars per day for each day the member attends a board meeting, subject to appropriation by the general assembly from the income from the trust lands.

The individual members of the state board of land commissioners shall have no personal liability for any action or failure to act as long as such action or failure to act does not involve willful or intentional malfeasance or gross negligence.

The people of the state of Colorado have recognized in section 10 of article IX of the state constitution that the state school lands are an endowment of land assets held in a perpetual, intergenerational public trust for the support of public schools, which should not be significantly diminished; that the disposition and use of such lands should therefore benefit public schools including local school districts; and that the economic productivity of all lands held in public trust is dependent on sound stewardship, including protecting and enhancing the beauty, natural values, open space, and wildlife habitat thereof, for this and future generations. In recognition of these principles, the state board of land commissioners shall be governed by the standards set forth in section 10 of article IX of the state constitution in the discharge of its fiduciary obligations, in addition to other laws generally applicable to trustees.

The state board of land commissioners shall serve as the trustee for the lands granted to the state in public trust by the federal government, lands acquired in lieu thereof, and additional lands held by the board in public trust. The board shall have the duty to manage, control, encumber, and dispose of such lands in accordance with the purposes for which said grants of land were made and section 10 of article IX of the state constitution, and subject to such terms and conditions consistent therewith as may be prescribed by law.

It shall be the duty of the state board of land commissioners to provide for the prudent management, location, protection, sale, exchange, or other disposition of all lands heretofore, or which may hereafter be, held by the board as trustee pursuant to subsection (6) of section 9 of article IX of the state constitution, in order to produce a reasonable and consistent income over time. The state board of land commissioners shall protect and enhance the long-term productivity and sound stewardship of the trust lands held by the board.

The state board of land commissioners shall manage the development and utilization of natural resources on state lands in a manner which will conserve the long-term value of such resources, as well as existing and future uses, and in accordance with state and local laws and regulations.

Source:

L. 77:

Entire section added, p. 1619, § 1, effective May 26.

L. 97:

Entire section amended, p. 832, § 2, effective May 21.

L. 2022:

IP(2) and (2)(e) amended, (SB 22-013), ch. 2, p. 81, § 110, effective February 25.

Editor's note:

Subsection (3)(c) provided for the repeal of subsections (3)(b) and (3)(c), effective June 30, 2002. (See L. 97, p. 832.)

36-1-102. Employees - director - bonds - report.

The state board of land commissioners shall hire, pursuant to section 13 of article XII of the state constitution and with the consent of the governor, a director, and, through the director, shall employ an office force. The director shall, subject to the general policies of the state board of land commissioners, have administrative direction over the activities of the state board of land commissioners. The state board of land commissioners may contract for office space, acquire equipment and supplies, and enter into contracts as necessary to accomplish its duties.

It is the duty of the director to keep the records of the state board of land commissioners; to make out and countersign all patents and leases issued by the board to purchasers and lessees of state lands, and keep a suitable record of the same; to file and preserve bonds of lessees and those given by purchasers to secure deferred payments; to make and deliver to purchasers a suitable certificate of purchase; to have the custody of the seal of the state board of land commissioners; to keep the minutes of the board; to receive all moneys collected on account of the state board of land commissioners, and to pay them over to the state treasurer, as prescribed by law; and to perform such other duties concerning the land affairs of the state as the said board may direct.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 97, p. 835, § 3, effective May 21, 1997.)

The board shall be provided with a suitable office and office furniture by the office of state planning and budgeting.

The state board of land commissioners shall publish on or before November 1 of each year, subject to the approval and control of the executive director of the department of natural resources, a summary of the transactions of the state board of land commissioners, and the land affairs of the state, showing, by tables, the land belonging to the several funds of the state, to whom sold, the amount leased, and the receipts from all sources, and such summary shall contain any such other items or information concerning state lands as the state board of land commissioners or the executive director of the department of natural resources may deem worthy of publication. The state board of land commissioners shall deliver the summary of land transactions prepared pursuant to this subsection (4) as specified in subsection (8) of this section.

Before assuming the duties of his office, each member of the state board of land commissioners shall give a surety bond, the expense of which shall be paid from the operating funds of the state board of land commissioners, in the sum of thirty thousand dollars, conditional upon the faithful discharge of his duties, which bond shall be approved by the governor and state treasurer and filed with the secretary of state.

The board shall report annually to the executive director of the department of natural resources at such time and on such matters as the executive director may require. Publications of the board circulated in quantity outside the department shall be subject to the approval and control of the executive director.

Repealed.

Notwithstanding section 24-1-136 (11)(a)(I), the state board of land commissioners shall deliver a copy of the summary of land transactions required pursuant to subsection (4) of this section, the investment and development fund report required pursuant to section 36-1-153 (4), and the income and inventory report required pursuant to section 36-1-153.5 (1) on or before November 1, 2011, and on or before November 1 of each year thereafter, to the members of the house and senate education committees, or any successor committees, the members of the house agriculture, livestock, and natural resources committee and the senate agriculture and natural resources committee, or any successor committees, the members of the joint budget committee, the members of the state board of education, and the state treasurer. In addition, the state board of land commissioners shall make the summary of land transactions, the investment and development fund report, and the income and inventory report available to the public on the state board of land commissioners website on or before November 1, 2011, and on or before November 1 of each year thereafter.

Source:

L. 19:

p. 638, § 2.

C.L.

§ 1147.

CSA:

C. 134, § 45.

CRS 53:

§ 112-3-2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 112-3-2.

L. 64:

p. 164, § 120.

L. 75:

(3) amended, p. 821, § 16, effective July 18, 1975.

L. 85:

(7) added, p. 242, § 4, effective May 16, 1985.

L. 96:

(7) repealed, p. 1222, § 20, effective August 7.

L. 97:

(1) and (2) amended, p. 835, § 3, effective May 21.

L. 2011:

(4) amended and (8) added, (SB 11-029), ch. 51, p. 132, § 1, effective August 10.

L. 2017:

(8) amended, (HB 17-1257), ch. 254, p. 1065, § 9, effective August 9.

Cross references:

(1) For the state personnel system, see § 13 of art. XII, Colo. Const., and article 50 of title 24.

(2) For the legislative declaration contained in the 1996 act repealing subsection (7), see section 1 of chapter 237, Session Laws of Colorado 1996.

36-1-103. Deputy register - duties - bond. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 19:

p. 639, § 3.

C.L.

§ 1148.

CSA:

C. 134, § 47.

CRS 53:

§ 112-3-3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 112-3-3.

L. 97:

Entire section repealed, p. 835, § 4, effective May 21.

36-1-104. Deed - execution - copy of record.

The governor is authorized, and, in case of his absence or inability, the lieutenant governor is authorized, to execute a good and sufficient deed or patent of conveyance transferring any lands which may be ordered sold or which shall be sold and disposed of by the state board of land commissioners under the statutes of this state. Such deed or patent shall be attested by the secretary of state, countersigned by the director of the state board of land commissioners, and have the great seal of the state and the seal of the state board of land commissioners thereto attached, but need not be acknowledged. A certified copy of the record of any such deed or patent shall be receivable in evidence in all courts of record in this state, the same as the original.

Where such deed or patent may be issued pursuant to this section to a person who has died before the date of such deed or patent, the title to the land designated therein shall inure to and become vested in the heirs, devisees, or assignees of such deceased grantee or patentee as if the deed or patent had issued to the deceased person during life.

Source:

L. 19:

p. 640, § 4.

C.L.

§ 1149.

CSA:

C. 134, § 48.

L. 49:

p. 552, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 112-3-4.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 112-3-4.

L. 97:

(1) amended, p. 836, § 5, effective May 21.

36-1-105. Selection and location of lands.

It is the duty of the state board of land commissioners to select and locate all lands which are on or after March 31, 1919, granted to this state by the general government, for any purpose whatever, and the board shall take the necessary steps to secure the approval of such selections by the proper officers of the general government. In making such selections, the board may employ such agents and means as may be necessary to acquaint the board with the character of the lands selected; and the board may provide to have the lands belonging to the state classified and appraised.

Source:

L. 19:

p. 640, § 5.

C.L.

§ 1150.

CSA:

C. 134, § 49.

CRS 53:

§ 112-3-5.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 112-3-5.

36-1-106. Appraisers' reports. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 17:

p. 506, § 3.

C.L.

§ 1153.

CSA:

C. 134, § 52.

CRS 53:

§ 112-3-6.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 112-3-6.

L. 97:

Entire section repealed, p. 836, § 6, effective May 21.

36-1-107. Resolution of selection.

The state board of land commissioners from time to time shall make selection and location of the lands to which the state is entitled under the several grants of land from congress by including in its minutes a proper resolution, particularly designating all such pieces, parcels, or tracts of land so selected and located, and thereupon from time to time said board shall promptly take all necessary and proper steps to effectually secure the approval thereof by the proper officers of the general government.

Source:

L. 17:

p. 506, § 4.

C.L.

§ 1154.

CSA:

C. 134, § 53.

CRS 53:

§ 112-3-7.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 112-3-7.

36-1-107.5. Long-term stewardship trust - nomination.

In order to fulfill the mandate of section 10 (1)(b)(I) of article IX of the state constitution, the state board of land commissioners shall, through a statewide public nomination process, establish a long-term stewardship trust of up to three hundred thousand acres of land that the state board of land commissioners determines to be valuable primarily to preserve long-term benefits and returns to the state and to be held and managed to maximize options for continued stewardship, public use, or future disposition. In holding such lands in trust, the state board of land commissioners shall permit only those uses that will protect and enhance the beauty, natural values, open space, and wildlife habitat of those lands; except that any such restrictions on use need not necessarily preclude existing uses or management practices including but not limited to mineral resources, agricultural, and grazing uses.

The state board of land commissioners shall provide written notification of any lands under consideration to be selected for the long-term stewardship trust to any present lessees with interest in such lands and the board of county commissioners, if such lands are located within the unincorporated portion of a county, the municipal governing body, if such lands are located within an incorporated municipality, or both the board of county commissioners and the municipal governing body, if such lands are located within three miles of any incorporated municipality.

In such notification, the state board of land commissioners shall request the local governing body or bodies to comment on whether existing uses and management practices are in compliance with valid local land use regulations and land use plans as required in section 10 (1)(c) of article IX of the state constitution. The state board of land commissioners shall further request in such notification that, within forty-five days after receipt of the notification, the local governing body or bodies provide comment to the state board of land commissioners on whether the selection is in accordance with the provisions of article IX of the state constitution.

In the notification, the state board of land commissioners shall also request that the local governing body or bodies may also include in its assessment and response any other factors the local governing body or bodies determine are relevant for the consideration of lands for the long-term stewardship trust, including the criteria set forth in this section and in sections 9 and 10 of article IX of the state constitution.

If the state board of land commissioners' staff recommendation is in conflict with the assessment of the governing body or bodies, the state board of land commissioners shall submit a written response, by certified mail, to the appropriate governing body or bodies at least fourteen days before making a final decision on a selection of lands on which the local governing body or bodies have provided written comment.

The state board of land commissioners shall develop and implement a statewide public nominating process for lands to be included in the long-term stewardship trust established pursuant to subsections (1) and (2) of this section. Using this process, the state board of land commissioners shall designate at least two hundred thousand acres of land to be part of the long-term stewardship trust on or before January 1, 1999, and shall designate at least an additional ninety-five thousand acres on or before January 1, 2001.

In selecting and locating lands for inclusion in the long-term stewardship trust, the state board of land commissioners shall make its determination based on criteria and requirements set forth in section 10 of article IX of the state constitution, including the provision specifying that the use of land in the long-term stewardship trust shall comply with valid local land use regulations and land use plans.

The state board of land commissioners may remove specific parcels of land from the long-term stewardship trust only upon the affirmative vote of four members of the state board of land commissioners and upon the designation or exchange of an equal or greater amount of additional land into said trust.

Prior to the inclusion of any land in the long-term stewardship trust, the state board of land commissioners shall consult existing published information concerning the agricultural and mineral resources potential of said land, including master plans developed under section 34-1-304, C.R.S. If information as to agricultural and mineral resource potential is inadequate, the board shall obtain an inventory of the mineral resources potential of said land first from the Colorado geological survey, or, if the Colorado geological survey is unable to complete such inventory, from an entity of equivalent credibility. If such inventory is not completed within one year after the request by the state board of land commissioners or is not completed prior to the deadline set forth in section 10 of article IX of the state constitution, the inclusion of such land in the long-term stewardship trust may proceed.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire section added, p. 836, § 7, effective May 21.

L. 98:

(2) (c) amended, p. 828, § 49, effective August 5.

36-1-108. Appraisal - classification - plat.

Immediately after the selection of said indemnity land is completed, the state board of land commissioners shall begin a general appraisal of all lands owned by the state. The board shall provide proper books for such purpose wherein shall be set forth the legal description, general character and adaptability, and appraised valuation of each of the several pieces, parcels, or tracts of lands so classified and appraised, together with such other useful information as the board shall deem necessary. The board also from time to time shall provide proper plats showing all such lands so classified and appraised.

Source:

L. 17:

p. 506, § 5.

C.L.

§ 1155.

CSA:

C. 134, § 54.

CRS 53:

§ 112-3-8.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 112-3-8.

36-1-109. Reclassification.

The state board of land commissioners has the power from time to time to reclassify and reappraise any lands owned by the state and shall make the same record thereof as provided by this article for the original classification and appraisal of such lands and shall make the necessary notations or changes on its existing records.

Source:

L. 17:

p. 507, § 6.

C.L.

§ 1156.

CSA:

C. 134, § 55.

CRS 53:

§ 112-3-9.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 112-3-9.

36-1-110. Books and plats - public records.

All books and plats required by this article to be provided and kept by the state board of land commissioners shall be a part of the public records of said board and shall be open to inspection.

Source:

L. 17:

p. 507, § 7.

C.L.

§ 1157.

CSA:

C. 134, § 56.

CRS 53:

§ 112-3-10.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 112-3-10.

36-1-111. Land appraisers. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 19:

p. 640, § 6.

C.L.

§ 1158.

CSA:

C. 134, § 57.

CRS 53:

§ 112-3-11.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 112-3-11.

L. 97:

Entire section repealed, p. 838, § 8, effective May 21.

36-1-112. Fees - disposition of fees.

The state board of land commissioners is authorized to collect fees for the issuance of leases, patents, certificates of purchase, right-of-way documents, and recording assignments, for the making of township plats, for the filing of bonds, and for the filing of all documents necessary to be filed in the office at amounts set by the board which shall cover all direct and indirect costs of the board in the administration of this article.

All moneys collected by the state board of land commissioners for fees collected as specified in subsection (1) of this section shall be deposited by the director of the state board of land commissioners with the state treasurer for credit as provided in section 36-1-148.

Source:

L. 19:

p. 641, § 7.

C.L.

§ 1159.

CSA:

C. 134, § 58.

L. 45:

p. 522, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 112-3-12.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 112-3-12.

L. 65:

p. 921, § 1.

L. 71:

pp. 1096, 1097, §§ 2, 3.

L. 77:

(1)(q) added, p. 1620, § 1, effective May 26.

L. 79:

Entire section amended, p. 1345, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 92:

Entire section amended, p. 1909, § 1, effective March 4.

L. 97:

(2) amended, p. 838, § 9, effective May 21.

36-1-112.5. Fiscal impact study.

Prior to the lease, sale, or exchange of any lands for commercial, residential, or industrial development, the state board of land commissioners shall determine that the income from the proposed lease, sale, or exchange can reasonably be anticipated to exceed the fiscal impact of such development on local school districts and state funding of education from increased school enrollment associated with such development. When determining the fiscal impact of the proposed lease, sale, or exchange of any land that is a part of any mining operation, the state board of land commissioners shall consider the fiscal and other benefits to the local school districts from the development of the entire operation.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire section added, p. 838, § 10, effective May 21.

36-1-113. Leases - rental - mineral resources lands.

The state board of land commissioners may lease any portion of the land of the state at a rental to be determined by it, except as provided in sections 36-1-118, 36-1-123.5, 36-1-147, and 36-1-147.5. The lessee shall pay the annual rental to the board, who shall receipt for the same in the lease. Upon receiving such annual rental, the board shall transmit the same to the state treasurer, as provided by law, and take his or her receipt therefor. If geothermal resources or mineral resources are found upon the state land, such land may be leased for the purpose of removing such resources for such length of time and conditioned upon the payment to the board of such royalty upon the product as the board may determine.

All geothermal leases issued by the state board of land commissioners may be awarded as the result of negotiation or competitive bidding, but no such lease shall be executed until after at least thirty days' public notice that the award of a lease is contemplated.

As used in this subsection (3), "logical mining area" means an area of land in which metallic and industrial minerals, construction materials, or coal resources can be developed in an efficient, economical, and orderly manner as an integrated operation with due regard to conservation of such resources. A logical mining area may consist of state lands including one or more state surface or mineral leases, or both such types of leases, and may include lands owned by other persons or entities.
(3) (a) (I) As used in this subsection (3), "logical mining area" means an area of land in which metallic and industrial minerals, construction materials, or coal resources can be developed in an efficient, economical, and orderly manner as an integrated operation with due regard to conservation of such resources. A logical mining area may consist of state lands including one or more state surface or mineral leases, or both such types of leases, and may include lands owned by other persons or entities.

As used in this subsection (3), "oil and gas unit" means a federal exploratory unit pursuant to unit plan regulations under 43 CFR 3160, unit operations under section 34-60-118, C.R.S., or drilling and spacing units and pooling of interests under section 34-60-116, C.R.S. An oil and gas unit may consist of state lands including one or more state surface or mineral leases, or both such types of leases, and may include lands owned by other persons or entities.

With respect to all surface and mineral lands, or both, included in whole or in part in a logical mining area for those operations permitted under article 32, 32.5, or 33 of title 34, C.R.S., as of July 1, 1997, or, in an oil and gas unit established under applicable federal or state law as of July 1, 1997, nothing in this article shall preclude the state board of land commissioners from issuing a new lease, renewing an existing lease, or issuing a lease extension consistent with article IX of the state constitution to facilitate the complete and orderly development and reclamation of such mining operations or of such oil and gas operations.

When the state board of land commissioners considers whether a lease for such land included in a logical mining area or in an oil and gas unit established under applicable federal or state law as of July 1, 1997, should be issued, renewed, or extended to accomplish the orderly development and reclamation of a logical mining area or to conduct oil and gas operations, the state board of land commissioners shall specifically consider in making its findings:

Whether the benefit to the trust, including the current or proposed income produced from the mining or oil and gas operation, is outweighed by current or proposed uses other than the mining or oil and gas operation; and

Whether the mining or oil and gas operation is incompatible with current or proposed uses.

Nothing in this section shall affect the obligation of any lessee from complying with any federal, state, or local law, rule, code, or regulation.

Source:

L. 19:

p. 642, § 8.

C.L.

§ 1160.

CSA:

C. 134, § 59.

CRS 53:

§ 112-3-13.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 112-3-13.

L. 74:

Entire section amended, p. 313, § 2, effective May 17.

L. 75:

Entire section amended, p. 222, § 75, effective July 16.

L. 97:

(1) amended and (3) added, p. 839, § 11, effective May 21.

L. 2007:

(1) amended, p. 620, § 1, effective August 3.

L. 2009:

(1) amended, (HB 09-1317), ch. 381, p. 2073, § 3, effective June 2.

36-1-114. Adjustment of rentals.

When, in its opinion, conditions justify, the state board of land commissioners has the power to adjust rentals under any existing, expired, or defaulted lease on state lands in a manner to comply with the requirements of sections 9 and 10 of article IX of the state constitution and may accept payments on delinquent rentals in accordance with such adjustments.

Source:

L. 37:

p. 939, § 1.

CSA:

C. 134, § 59(1).

CRS 53:

§ 112-3-14.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 112-3-14.

L. 97:

Entire section amended, p. 840, § 12, effective May 21.

36-1-115. Development of oil, gas, or geothermal resource areas.

The state board of land commissioners is authorized to join on behalf of the state in a cooperative or unit plan of development or operation for any oil, gas, or geothermal resource pool, field, or area, or for any part of any such pool, field, or area, with the United States government and its lessees or with others or with both such parties and, for that purpose, is authorized at or after the time of joining to modify and change any and all terms of the leases issued under the provisions of articles 1 to 7 of this title as mutually agreed by the lessor and lessee in any such lease, including the extension of the term of years otherwise applicable to any such lease for the full period of time such cooperative or unit plan may remain in effect, as required to conform with the terms of any such lease to such cooperative or unit plan and to facilitate the efficient and economic production of the oil, gas, or geothermal resource from the lands so affected. Any such cooperative or unit plan, including lands owned by the state, may, in the discretion of the state board of land commissioners, contain a provision whereby authority is vested in the secretary of the interior if lands of the United States are also included or in any such person, committee, or state or federal officer or agency as may be designated in the plan to alter or modify from time to time the rate of prospecting and development and the quantity and rate of production under such plan.

Source:

L. 47:

p. 692, § 1.

CSA:

C. 134, § 59(2).

CRS 53:

§ 112-3-15.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 112-3-15.

L. 74:

Entire section amended, p. 314, § 3, effective May 17.

L. 2007:

Entire section amended, p. 2048, § 92, effective June 1.

Cross references:

For leasing and development of school district lands for oil and gas, see § 22-32-112.